Georgia, session 2025_26, SB378.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Anti-Corruption Act."
SECTION 2.
Chapter 5 of Title 21 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to government
transparency and campaign finance, is amended by revising Code Section 21-5-34.2, relating
to leadership committee defined, operation, and separate from campaign committees, as
follows:
S. B. 378
- 1 -

LC 47 3720
"21-5-34.2.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term 'leadership committee' means a committee,
corporation, or organization chaired by the Governor, the Lieutenant Governor, the
nominee of a political party for Governor selected in a primary election in the year in
which he or she is nominated, or the nominee of a political party for Lieutenant Governor
selected in a primary election in the year in which he or she is nominated. Such term shall
also mean up to two political action committees designated by the majority caucus of the
House of Representatives, the minority caucus of the House of Representatives, the
majority caucus of the Senate, and the minority caucus of the Senate. No person may chair
more than one leadership committee.
(b) Leadership committees shall be prohibited, and any leadership committee in existence
on July 1, 2026, shall be prohibited from making further expenditures, return all
contributions to the persons who made such contributions, and upon disposing of all assets
dissolve its legal existence. A leadership committee may receive contributions from
persons who are members or supporters of the leadership committee and expend such funds
as permitted by this Code section.
(c) If a person chairing a leadership committee ceases to hold the office or the status as a
nominee of a political party as described in subsection (a) of this Code section, such person
shall transfer the remaining assets of the leadership committee, if any, to another leadership
committee within 60 days, name an eligible person as the new chairperson of the leadership
committee within 60 days, or dispose of the leadership committee's assets as provided by
Code Section 21-5-33.
(d) A leadership committee may accept contributions or make expenditures for the purpose
of affecting the outcome of any election or advocating for the election or defeat of any
candidate, may defray ordinary and necessary expenses incurred in connection with any
candidate's campaign for elective office, and may defray ordinary and necessary expenses
incurred in connection with a public officer's fulfillment or retention of such office.
S. B. 378
- 2 -

LC 47 3720
(e) A leadership committee which accepts contributions or makes expenditures in excess
of $500.00 shall register with the commission within ten days of such accepted contribution
or such expenditure and, thereafter, shall file disclosure reports pursuant to the schedule
defined for candidates and campaign committees in subsection (c) of Code
Section 21-5-34. Such disclosure reports shall be made pursuant to subsection (b) of Code
Section 21-5-34. The contribution limits in Code Section 21-5-41 shall not apply to
contributions to a leadership committee or expenditures made by a leadership committee
in support of a candidate or a group of named candidates. All communications paid for by
expenditures of the leadership committee shall contain a disclaimer, either audibly or in
writing, that the communication is paid for by the leadership committee, unless such
disclaimer is impractical.
(f) A leadership committee shall be a separate legal entity from a candidate's campaign
committee and shall not be considered an independent committee."
SECTION 3.
Said chapter is further amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"21-5-77.
On and after July 1, 2026, no organization of which the majority of the members are
political subdivisions of this state, elected or appointed officers or officials of this state, or
a county, municipality, school district, or other political subdivision and which is the
beneficiary of public funds appropriated by the state or any county, municipality,
consolidated government, school system, or other political subdivision shall engage in
lobbying or make any lobbying expenditures."
SECTION 4.
This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2026.
S. B. 378
- 3 -

LC 47 3720
SECTION 5.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 378
- 4 -